Utah statutes.
58-28-201.   Veterinary Board created -- Duties.
(1)  There is created a Veterinary Board consisting of four veterinarians who
have practiced in the state for not less than five years and one member of the
general public.
(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with the provisions
of Section 58-1-201.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with
Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.
(4) (a)  The board shall designate one of its members to assist and advise the
division with reviewing complaints concerning unlawful or unprofessional
conduct under this chapter.
(b)  A board member shall be recused from any adjudicative proceeding held by
the board concerning a complaint for which the board member advised the
division under Subsection (4)(a).
